District of Columbia statutes.
34-1516

New generating facilities in the District of Columbia.

No person shall construct an electric generating facility for the purpose of the retail or wholesale sale of electricity unless the Commission first determines, after notice and a hearing, that the construction of the electric generating facility is in the public interest.

History

May 9, 2000, D.C. Law 13-107, § 116, 47 DCR 1091

Section References

This section is referenced in § 34-1504.